Massachusetts, session 194th, H1075.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 66 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking the section in its entirety and replacing it with the following:-
"Section 66. The director, under the control of the board, may promulgate regulations for
the use and possession of shotgun ammunition types for the purposes of hunting."
of 1